Illinois, session 104th, HB2086.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Accountability and Performance 5System Act is amended by changing Section 3-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 25/3-1)7    Sec. 3-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Public Accountability and Performance System Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-45, eff. 7-15-09.)